Utah statutes.
41-3-208.   Salesperson's license -- Relinquishment upon loss or change of employment -- Notice to salesperson -- New license required.

(1)  If a salesperson is discharged from or leaves his employer, the dealer who last employed the salesperson shall return the salesperson's license to the administrator.

(2)  The salesperson shall be notified at his last known place of residence that his license has been returned to the administrator.

(3)  A person may not act as a motor vehicle salesperson until a new license is procured.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 234, 1992 General Session

